Utah statutes.
79-4-302.   Board appointment and terms of members -- Expenses.
(1) (a)  The board is composed of nine members appointed by the governor, with
the consent of the Senate, to four-year terms.
(b)  In addition to the requirements of Section 79-2-203, the governor shall:
(i)  appoint one member from each judicial district and one member from the
public at large;
(ii)  ensure that not more than five members are from the same political
party; and
(iii)  appoint persons who have an understanding of and demonstrated interest
in parks and recreation.
(c)  Notwithstanding the term requirements of Subsection (1)(a), the governor
may adjust the length of terms to ensure that the terms of board members are
staggered so that approximately half of the board is appointed every two
years.
(2)  When vacancies occur because of death, resignation, or other cause, the
governor, with the consent of the Senate, shall:
(a)  appoint a person to complete the unexpired term of the person whose
office was vacated; and
(b)  if the person was appointed from a judicial district, appoint the
replacement from the judicial district from which the person whose office has
become vacant was appointed.
(3)  The board shall appoint its chair from its membership.
(4)  A member may not receive compensation or benefits for the member's
service, but may receive per diem and travel expenses in accordance with:
(a)  Section 63A-3-106;
(b)  Section 63A-3-107; and
(c)  rules made by the Division of Finance pursuant to Sections 63A-3-106 and
63A-3-107.
